District of Columbia statutes.
23-1333

Consideration of juvenile history.

A judicial officer shall, in determining whether there are conditions of release that will reasonably assure the appearance of the person as required, and the safety of any other person and the community, take into account the person’s juvenile law enforcement and case records.

May 15, 1993, D.C. Law 9-272, § 107, 40 DCR 796
1981 Ed., § 23-1333.